Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.160

Intimidating a judge.

(1) A person is guilty of intimidating a judge if a person directs a threat to a judge because of a ruling or decision of the judge in any official proceeding, or if by use of a threat directed to a judge, a person attempts to influence a ruling or decision of the judge in any official proceeding.

(2) "Threat" as used in this section means:

(a) To communicate, directly or indirectly, the intent immediately to use force against any person who is present at the time; or

(b) Threats as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(28).

(3) Intimidating a judge is a class B felony.

[ 2023 c 102 s 38; 1985 c 327 s 1.]

NOTES: